North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 18. Clean Water Management Trust Fund. [Repealed]

§ 113A-251.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.230 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-252.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.232 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-253.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.234 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-253.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 13.26(a), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 27.6(b); 1997-443, s. 7.9(a); 2000-67, ss. 7.7(b)-(d); 2001-474, s. 26; 2006-203, s. 5(a), (b); 2011-374, s. 2.3; repealed by 2011-145, s. 13.26(a), effective July 1, 2011.

§ 113A-253.2.

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.236 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-254.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.238 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-255.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.240 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-256.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.242 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-257.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.244 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-258.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.246 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.

§ 113A-259.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 143B-135.248 by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(k1), effective July 1, 2015.